Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.030

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Amateur society" means any organization composed primarily of persons who are not professional archaeologists, whose primary interest is in the archaeological resources of the state, and which has been certified in writing by two professional archaeologists.

(2) "Archaeological object" means an object that comprises the physical evidence of an indigenous and subsequent culture, including material remains of past human life, including monuments, symbols, tools, facilities, and technological by-products.

(3) "Archaeological site" means a geographic locality in Washington, including but not limited to, submerged and submersible lands and the bed of the sea within the state's jurisdiction, that contains archaeological objects.

(4) "Archaeology" means systematic, scientific study of humankind's past through material remains.

(5) "Department" means the department of archaeology and historic preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.

(6) "Director" means the director of the department of archaeology and historic preservation, created in chapter 43.334 RCW.

(7) "Field investigation" means an on-site inspection by a professional archaeologist or by an individual under the direct supervision of a professional archaeologist employing archaeological inspection techniques for both the surface and subsurface identification of archaeological resources and artifacts resulting in a professional archaeological report detailing the results of such inspection.

(8) "Historic" means peoples and cultures who are known through written documents in their own or other languages. As applied to underwater archaeological resources, the term "historic" shall include only those properties which are listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington state register of historic places (RCW 27.34.220) or the national register of historic places as defined in the national historic preservation act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.

(9) "Historic archaeological resources" means those properties which are listed in or eligible for listing in the Washington state register of historic places (RCW 27.34.220) or the national register of historic places as defined in the national historic preservation act of 1966 (Title 1, Sec. 101, Public Law 89-665; 80 Stat. 915; 16 U.S.C. Sec. 470) as now or hereafter amended.

(10) "Prehistoric" means peoples and cultures who are unknown through contemporaneous written documents in any language.

(11) "Professional archaeologist" means a person with qualifications meeting the federal secretary of the interior's standards for a professional archaeologist. Archaeologists not meeting this standard may be conditionally employed by working under the supervision of a professional archaeologist for a period of four years provided the employee is pursuing qualifications necessary to meet the federal secretary of the interior's standards for a professional archaeologist. During this four-year period, the professional archaeologist is responsible for all findings. The four-year period is not subject to renewal.

[ 2013 c 23 s 45. Prior: 2011 c 219 s 1; 2008 c 275 s 5; 2005 c 333 s 20; 1995 c 399 s 16; 1989 c 44 s 6; 1988 c 124 s 2; 1986 c 266 s 17; 1983 c 91 s 20; 1977 ex.s. c 195 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 134 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reporting requirements—2008 c 275: See note following RCW 68.50.645.

Intent—1989 c 44: See RCW 27.44.030.

Liberal construction—1989 c 44: See RCW 27.44.901.

Intent—1988 c 124: "It is the intent of the legislature that those historic archaeological resources located on state-owned aquatic lands that are of importance to the history of our state, or its communities, be protected for the people of the state. At the same time, the legislature also recognizes that divers have long enjoyed the recreation of diving near shipwrecks and picking up artifacts from the state-owned aquatic lands, and it is not the intent of the legislature to regulate these occasional, recreational activities except in areas where necessary to protect underwater historic archaeological sites. The legislature also recognizes that salvors who invest in a project to salvage underwater archaeological resources on state-owned aquatic lands should be required to obtain a state permit for their operation in order to protect the interest of the people of the state, as well as to protect the interest of the salvors who have invested considerable time and money in the salvage expedition." [ 1988 c 124 s 1.]

Application—1988 c 124: "This act shall not affect any ongoing salvage effort in which the state has entered into separate contracts or agreements prior to March 18, 1988." [ 1988 c 124 s 13.]

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.

Effective date—1983 c 91: See RCW 27.34.910.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 195: See note following RCW 27.53.020.